Illinois, session 104th, SB1577.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prohibition on Retail Tobacco Stores Near Schools Act. 6    Section 5. County and municipal duties. No county or 7municipality shall permit a retail tobacco store, as defined 8in Section 10 of the Smoke Free Illinois Act, to open an 9establishment within 100 feet of a school after the effective 10date of this Act. A county or municipality is not required to 11prohibit any establishment in existence prior to the effective 12date of this Act.